District of Columbia statutes.
22-4242

Annual reporting requirement.

Not later than 60 days after the end of each calendar year, the District of Columbia Criminal Justice Coordinating Council shall prepare and submit to the President, Congress, and each of the entities of the District of Columbia government and federal government whose representatives serve on the Council a report describing the activities carried out by the Council during the year.

History

May 20, 2002, 116 Stat. 581, Pub. L. 107-180, § 3